Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, by January 1, 2027, the department shall develop a referral pathway to services in communities that have high rates of child fatalities and near fatalities involving children under the age of four where parental use of high-potency synthetic opioids was a factor in the case. The department shall initiate the referral process as soon as is practical after determining a family would benefit from a referral to services. Services may begin during an investigation pursuant to RCW 26.44.030. An investigation does not need to remain open for a family to receive services under this section. Additionally, any services offered shall be available to the family for six months regardless of the case's status. The department shall prioritize resources for referrals to services involving children under the age of four and where high-potency synthetic opioids are a factor. However, nothing in this section prohibits the department from initiating a referral to services for cases that involve children over the age of four or when substance use is not a risk factor. The community-based referral process must include the following services when appropriate:(a) The plan of safe care community pathway;(b) Family resource centers; and(c) Public health nurses.(2) By January 1, 2027, the department shall implement a process to strengthen referrals and connections between families and noncontracted community-based services. The process described in this section must:(a) Facilitate a transition that connects eligible families with a community-based provider;(b) Aim to keep children safe, support families, and increase participation in services by eligible families; and(c) Incorporate a referral process to a community-based organization or community care hub with access to services which may include, but are not limited to:(i) Peer navigators;(ii) Behavioral health navigators;(iii) Parent allies; and(iv) Other services that would support families.(3) The department shall develop the referral process described in subsection (2) of this section in consultation with community-based service providers, tribes, network administrators as defined in RCW 74.13B.010, and support organizations including, but not limited to, those listed in subsection (2)(c) of this section.(4) The department shall inform the parent, custodian, or legal guardian in writing that services offered under this section are voluntary when referring parents, custodians, or legal guardians to services under this section. If the parent, custodian, or legal guardian agrees to voluntarily participate in services offered by the department under this section, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall sign a release of information.(5) By November 1, 2027, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature describing:(a) The processes developed under subsection (2) of this section; and(b) Any available and relevant data demonstrating the impact of the processes developed under subsection (2) of this section.(6) This section is not intended to supersede any provisions of the Washington state Indian child welfare act, chapter 13.38 RCW or the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.--- END ---